Rhode Island statutes. Title 18 Fiduciaries
Chapter 4 Powers of Fiduciaries

18-4-1.
Application of cy pres doctrine.

In all cases of charitable gifts of real or personal estate, whether by deed or will, where the purposes of the donor cannot be literally carried into effect, a complaint may be filed for a cy pres application of the trust property; and at that time all proceedings, orders, and decrees shall be had and taken in the suit, to carry out the intents of the donor as near as may be, that the charity may not fail, and to this end application as provided may be made in the same complaint for appointment of a new trustee or trustees under or pursuant to the provisions of §§

18-2-1

—

18-2-8

, or under the general equity powers of the court.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 208, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 259, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 303, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 487, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

18-4-1

.

18-4-2.
Powers of trustees.

Every trust, inter vivos or testamentary, previously or subsequently effective, in which no provision is made to the contrary, shall be deemed to give to the trustees or trustee under the trust for the time being, in addition to any other power they may lawfully have, full power in their, his, or her discretion, or if a corporation in the discretion of its duly authorized officer or committee:

To invest and reinvest the trust estate, or any part of it, in real or personal property, foreign or domestic, including, without limiting the generality of the preceding provisions, savings accounts of banks and trust companies and shares of stock or other securities of corporations, building and loan associations, investment trusts, and investment companies, and to vary from time to time the investments of the trust estate;

To exercise discretionary powers of sale, lease, partition by suit or deed, and exchange over the trust estate, or any part of it, whether real or personal property; in case of any sale, to sell at public or private sale, for cash or on credit and together or in parcels; in case of any lease, to lease for a period that the trustees or trustee shall deem advisable, whether terminating during the continuance of the trusts or thereafter; and in case of any partition or in case of any exchange, to give or receive money for equality of partition or exchange;

To appoint a proxy or proxies, with or without power of substitution, to vote shares of a corporation or association included in the trust estate as directed or in a manner that the proxy or proxies shall deem best;

To participate in, assent to, or disapprove any plan for the reorganization, recapitalization, consolidation, merger, winding up, or readjustment of the indebtedness of any corporation or association, and to take any and all action required by reason of participation in the plan; and

Upon the termination of any trust with respect to any portion of the trust estate, to set aside the portion from the remainder of the trust estate; upon the termination of any trust with respect to the entire trust estate, or any part of it, to partition the trust estate into the shares, if any, in which it is distributable; and in connection with the setting aside of any portion or any partition to exercise the power of sale conferred by this section upon the trustees or trustee, and to allocate to any share in or part of the trust estate specific investments at their fair value at the time of allocation as determined by the trustees or trustee acting in good faith.

To donate a conservation easement on any real property in order to obtain the benefit of the estate tax exclusion allowed under §§ 170 and 2031(c), respectively, of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, if:

Each party who has an interest in the real property that would be affected by the conservation easement consents in writing to the donation, or

The trust instrument directs, requires or permits a donation of a conservation easement in gross, in which case no consent shall be required.

The trustees or trustee may be authorized by the superior court to execute any or all of the powers set forth in subdivisions (a)(1) to (a)(5) of this section, upon the terms and conditions that the court may deem proper, notwithstanding any provision of any trust instrument which is or may possibly be deemed to be inconsistent with the exercise of any of these powers, if, in the opinion of the court, authority to exercise the power or powers is or may become necessary or desirable to enable the trustees or trustee to properly perform the duties and accomplish the purposes of the trust, the authorization to be granted only upon written application to a justice of the court and upon the notice, if any, that the justice may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 208, § 12; G.L. 1909, ch. 259, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 303, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 486, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

18-4-2

; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 48, § 1; P.L. 1964, ch. 55, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 34, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 100, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 101, § 1.

18-4-3.
Arbitration.

Trustees may enter into rule of the court, in like manner as other parties, to submit matters in dispute, in relation to the estates represented by them, to arbitration and award.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 208, § 13; C.P.A. 1905, § 1146; G.L. 1909, ch. 259, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 303, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 486, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

18-4-3

.

18-4-4.
Power of sale.

Where a trust for sale, or a power of sale of property, is vested in trustees, they may sell or concur with any other person in selling all or any part of the property, either subject to prior encumbrances or not, and either together or in lots, by public auction or by private contract, subject to any conditions respecting title or evidence of title or other matter as the trustees think fit, with power to vary any contract for sale and to buy in at any auction as the trustees deem advantageous, or to rescind any contract for sale and to resell without being answerable for any resulting loss.

This section applies only if, and as far as, a contrary intention is not expressed in the instrument creating the trust or power, and shall have effect, subject to the terms of that instrument and to the provisions therein contained.

This section applies only to a trust or power created by an instrument executed on or after the first day of February, 1896.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 208, § 14; G.L. 1909, ch. 259, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 303, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 486, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

18-4-4

.

18-4-5.
Effect of trustee’s receipt.

The receipt in writing of any trustees or trustee for any money, securities, or other personal property or effects, payable, transferable, or deliverable to them, him, her, or it, under any trust or power, expressly including purchase money and loans, shall be a sufficient discharge for the personal property or effects, and shall effectually exonerate the person paying, transferring, or delivering the personal property or effects from seeing to the application, or being answerable for any loss or misapplication.

This section applies to trusts previously or subsequently created.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 208, § 15; G.L. 1909, ch. 259, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 303, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 486, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

18-4-5

.

18-4-6.
Conveyance by infant trustee.

Whenever any person seised or possessed of any real or personal estate upon any express, implied, resulting, or constructive trust is under the age of eighteen (18) years, the infant shall, when the circumstances of the trust require, or the trust is to be terminated, by direction of the superior court in any suit brought for that purpose, convey and transfer the estate to the person and in a manner, either personally or by master, that the court may direct; and every conveyance shall pass to the grantee in the estate all the interest of the infant in the estate, as effectually as if the infant were of full age at the time of making the conveyance.

In case the infant does not make the conveyance, the infant may be compelled to make it by the court in like manner as if the infant were of full age.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 208, § 16; C.P.A. 1905, § 1220; G.L. 1909, ch. 259, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 303, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 486, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

18-4-6

.

18-4-7.
Disposition of money payable to infant trustee.

The superior court may make all necessary orders and decrees for the payment and disposition of money belonging to an infant trustee, which may be payable by any person, upon the making of any conveyance under the provisions of §

18-4-6

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 208, § 17; C.P.A. 1905, § 1220; G.L. 1909, ch. 259, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 303, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 486, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

18-4-7

.

18-4-8.
Settlement of debts and claims — Assent of court.

An executor or administrator, or two (2) or more trustees or assignees acting together, or a sole acting trustee or assignee, if by the instrument, if any, creating the trust the sole trustee or assignee is authorized to execute the trusts and powers thereof, may, if and as he, she, they, or it think fit, with the assent as provided in this section, accept any composition or any security, real or personal, for any debt or for any property, real or personal, claimed, and may allow any time for payment of any debt, and may compromise, compound, abandon, submit to arbitration, or otherwise settle, any debt, account, claim, or thing whatever, relating to the deceased person’s estate or to the trust; and for any of these purposes may enter into, give, execute, and do such agreements, instruments of composition or arrangement, releases, and other things that to him, her, it, or them seem expedient, without being responsible for any loss occasioned by any act or thing done by him, her, it, or them, in good faith, if done with the assent of the probate court in case of executors or administrators, and of one of the justices of the superior court in the case of trustees or assignees.

Application for the assent shall be in writing, and the assent, if given, shall be by order or decree and with or without notice or hearing, as the probate court or justice of the superior court shall deem best.

In case the order is made, or decree entered, the order or decree shall be final and not subject to appeal or rehearing.

As regards trustees or assignees, this section applies only if and as far as a contrary intention is not expressed in the instrument, if any, creating the trust, and shall have effect subject to the terms of that instrument and to the provisions contained in it.

This section applies to executorships, administratorships, trusts, and assignments previously or subsequently constituted or created.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 208, § 18; C.P.A. 1905, §§ 1220, 1232; G.L. 1909, ch. 259, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 303, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 486, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

18-4-8

.

18-4-9.
Powers of surviving fiduciaries.

Where a power or trust, whether discretionary or not, is given to or vested in two (2) or more executors, administrators, trustees, or assignees, jointly, then, unless the contrary is expressed in the instrument, if any, creating the power or trust, the power or trust may be exercised or performed by the survivors or survivor of them, or those occupying these positions for the time being.

This section shall only apply to powers and trusts created after January 31, 1896.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 208, § 19; G.L. 1909, ch. 259, § 19; G.L. 1923, ch. 303, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 486, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

18-4-9

.

18-4-10.
Management powers exercised with court approval.

Whenever the sale, exchange, conveyance, or leasing of the whole or of any part or parts of any property held upon trust, whether the property is real, personal, or both, or the borrowing of money upon the credit of any trust property, or the extension or renewal of any existing obligation binding upon the whole or any part or parts of the trust property, or the platting of any lands held upon trust, or the dedication, laying out, or conveyance, with or without compensation, of any lands for streets or ways, either in connection with the platting or independently, shall, for any reason, appear to be desirable, the superior court, upon complaint brought by any trustee of any property, may, subject to the further provisions of §§

18-4-11

—

18-4-14

, authorize one or more of these transactions as may appear necessary or expedient, and may or may not require security for the application of the proceeds, and may, if necessary or desirable, authorize the making or creation of a mortgage, pledge, or other lien of or upon the whole or any part or parts of the trust property, for the purpose of securing any borrowing of money, or of securing any extension or renewal of an existing obligation.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 208, § 11; C.P.A. 1905, § 1145; G.L. 1909, ch. 259, § 11; P.L. 1917, ch. 1501, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 303, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 486, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

18-4-10

.

18-4-11.
Purposes for which borrowing authorized.

Borrowing may be authorized for any one or more of the following purposes:

To pay assessments upon the trust property for betterments;

To pay for any repairs and improvements on the property that may be or become necessary or desirable by reason of the betterments, or by reason of the taking of any part or parts of the property by right of eminent domain;

To pay for the erection, alteration, completion, or establishment of or additions to any building, buildings, or other improvements on the property;

To discharge or reduce any existing obligations or encumbrances binding upon the trust property; or

To pay for any charge or expense for any other purpose whatsoever which the court may approve as necessary or desirable for the protection or benefit of the trust property.

Each borrowing may be authorized in an amount and on those terms and conditions and with any directions and instructions to the trustee or trustees that the court deems proper.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 259, § 11; P.L. 1917, ch. 1501, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 303, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 486, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

18-4-11

.

18-4-12.
Leases authorized.

Leasing may be authorized either generally or with reference to a specific lease, for a fixed period or periods, whether or not the period or periods may extend beyond the time limited for the determination of the trust, with those privileges of renewal, upon the terms, and subject to the covenants and agreements, whether incidental or collateral, that the court may deem necessary or desirable, with power in the court to confer upon the trustee or trustees full or qualified discretion to determine any of the provisions of the lease or leases.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 259, § 11; P.L. 1917, ch. 1501, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 303, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 486, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

18-4-12

.

18-4-13.
Parties to management proceedings — Guardians ad litem — Costs.

Any persons who have any vested, contingent, executory, or future right, title, interest, or estate in or to any part of the trust property, and any persons who might by any future contingency have any right, title, interest, or estate, may join in bringing a proceeding under §

18-4-10

, and any persons who do not join may be made parties defendant.

Any persons not ascertained or not in being, who are or who may become entitled to any contingent, executory, or other future right, title, interest, or estate, together with the interests of these persons, may be designated and described in the proceeding for the purpose of having guardians ad litem appointed to represent them and their interests as provided in this section.

Notice of the pendency of the proceeding shall be given to all parties defendant and to all persons not in being or not ascertained in the manner that the court may order.

The court shall, in every proceeding, appoint guardians ad litem, who may also act as counsel, to represent parties non sui juris and persons not in being or not ascertained, who are designated and described according to this section, and the interests of these parties and persons.

The cost of the appearance and services of the guardians ad litem and counsel, to be determined by the court, shall be paid, as the court may order, either out of the trust property generally, or out of the proceeds of any disposition of the property which may be ordered, or by the party or parties to the proceeding as the court may order.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 259, § 11; P.L. 1917, ch. 1501, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 303, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 486, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

18-4-13

.

18-4-14.
Binding effect of authorized transactions.

Any transaction authorized under this chapter shall be binding upon the entire estate and interest in the trust property of all the parties to the proceeding and of all persons designated and described in the proceeding, as provided.

No transaction, note, covenant, or other obligation, executed or entered into as a part of or as an incident to any transaction, shall bind the trustee or trustees personally, insofar as the transaction, note, covenant, or other obligation is made by the trustee or trustees in his or her or their representative capacity.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 259, § 11; P.L. 1917, ch. 1501, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 303, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 486, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

18-4-14

.

18-4-15.
Definitions.

In §§

18-4-16

—

18-4-21

, unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires:

“Bank” includes any person or association of persons, whether incorporated or not, carrying on the business of banking.

“Fiduciary” includes a trustee under any trust, expressed, implied, resulting, or constructive, executor, administrator, guardian, conservator, curator, receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, assignee for the benefit of creditors, partner, agent, officer of a corporation, public or private, public officer, or any other person acting in a fiduciary capacity for any person, trust, or estate.

“Person” includes a corporation, partnership, or other association, or two (2) or more persons having a joint or common interest.

“Principal” includes any person to whom a fiduciary owes an obligation.

A thing is done “in good faith”, within the meaning of §§

18-4-16

—

18-4-21

, when it is in fact done honestly, whether it is done negligently or not.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 147, § 3.

18-4-16.
Payments or transfers to fiduciaries — Effect of misapplication by fiduciary.

A person who in good faith pays or transfers to a fiduciary any money or other property, which the fiduciary is authorized to receive, is not responsible for the proper application of the money or other property by the fiduciary; and any right or title acquired from the fiduciary in consideration of the payment or transfer is not invalid in consequence of a misapplication by the fiduciary.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 147, § 3.

18-4-17.
Transfer of negotiable instrument by fiduciary.

If any negotiable instrument payable or indorsed to a fiduciary is indorsed by the fiduciary, or if any negotiable instrument payable or indorsed to his or her principal is indorsed by a fiduciary empowered to indorse the instrument on behalf of his or her principal, the indorsee is not bound to inquire whether the fiduciary is committing a breach of his or her obligation as fiduciary in indorsing or delivering the instrument, and is not chargeable with notice that the fiduciary is committing a breach of his or her obligation as fiduciary, unless he or she takes the instrument with actual knowledge of the breach, or with knowledge of any facts that his or her action in taking the instrument amounts to bad faith. If, however, the instrument is transferred by the fiduciary in payment of or as security for a personal debt of the fiduciary to the actual knowledge of the creditor, or is transferred in any transaction known by the transferee to be for the personal benefit of the fiduciary, the creditor or other transferee is liable to the principal if the fiduciary in fact commits a breach of his or her obligation as fiduciary in transferring the instrument.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 147, § 3.

18-4-18.
Check drawn by fiduciary payable to third person.

If a check or other bill of exchange is drawn by a fiduciary, or in the name of his or her principal by a fiduciary empowered to draw the instrument in the name of his or her principal, the payee is not bound to inquire whether the fiduciary is committing a breach of his or her obligation as fiduciary in drawing or delivering the instrument, and is not chargeable with notice that the fiduciary is committing a breach of his or her obligation as fiduciary, unless he or she takes the instrument with actual knowledge of the breach, or with knowledge of any facts that his or her action in taking the instrument amounts to bad faith. If, however, the instrument is payable to a personal creditor of the fiduciary and delivered to the creditor in payment of or as security for a personal debt of the fiduciary to the actual knowledge of the creditor, or is drawn and delivered in any transaction known by the payee to be for the personal benefit of the fiduciary, the creditor or other payee is liable to the principal if the fiduciary in fact commits a breach of his or her obligation as fiduciary in drawing or delivering the instrument.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 147, § 3.

18-4-19.
Check drawn by and payable to fiduciary.

If a check or other bill of exchange is drawn by a fiduciary or in the name of his or her principal by a fiduciary empowered to draw the instrument in the name of his or her principal, payable to the fiduciary personally, or payable to a third person and by him or her transferred to the fiduciary, and is thereafter transferred by the fiduciary, whether in payment of a personal debt of the fiduciary or otherwise, the transferee is not bound to inquire whether the fiduciary is committing a breach of his or her obligation as fiduciary in transferring the instrument, and is not chargeable with notice that the fiduciary is committing a breach of his or her obligation as fiduciary, unless he or she takes the instrument with actual knowledge of the breach, or with knowledge of any facts that his or her action in taking the instrument amounts to bad faith.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 147, § 3.

18-4-20.
Deposit in name of fiduciary.

If a deposit is made in a bank to the credit of a fiduciary, the bank is authorized to pay the amount of the deposit or any part of it upon the check of the fiduciary, signed with the name in which the deposit is entered, without being liable to the principal, unless the bank pays the check with actual knowledge that the fiduciary is committing a breach of his or her obligation as fiduciary in drawing the check, or with knowledge of any facts that its action in paying the check amounts to bad faith. If, however, a check is payable to the drawee bank and is delivered to it in payment of or as security for a personal debt of the fiduciary to it, the bank is liable to the principal if the fiduciary in fact commits a breach of his or her obligation as fiduciary in drawing or delivering the check.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 147, § 3.

18-4-21.
Deposit in fiduciary’s personal account.

If a fiduciary makes a deposit in a bank to his or her personal credit of checks drawn by him or her upon an account in his or her own name as fiduciary, or of checks payable to him or her as fiduciary, or of checks drawn by him or her upon an account in the name of his or her principal if he or she is empowered to draw checks on that account, or of checks payable to his or her principal and indorsed by him or her, if he or she is empowered to indorse these checks, or if he or she otherwise makes a deposit of funds held by him or her as fiduciary, the bank receiving the deposit is not bound to inquire whether the fiduciary is committing a breach of his or her obligation as fiduciary; and the bank is authorized to pay the amount of the deposit or any part of it upon the personal check of the fiduciary without being liable to the principal, unless the bank receives the deposit or pays the check with actual knowledge that the fiduciary is committing a breach of his or her obligation as fiduciary in making the deposit or in drawing the check, or with knowledge of any facts that its action in receiving the deposit or paying the check amounts to bad faith.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 147, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

18-4-22

; P.L. 1969, ch. 43, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

18-4-21

.

18-4-22.
Administration of trusts.

In the administration of any trust which is a “private foundation,” a “charitable trust,” or a “split-interest trust,” as these terms are defined in §§ 509(a), 4947(a)(1), and 4947(a)(2), respectively, of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. §§ 509(a), 4947(a)(1) and 4947(a)(2), the following acts are prohibited:

Engaging in any act of “self-dealing,” as defined in § 4941(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 4941(d), which would give rise to any liability for the tax imposed by § 4941(a);

Retaining any “excess business holdings,” as defined in § 4943(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 4943(c), which would give rise to any liability for the tax imposed by § 4943(a);

Making any investments which would jeopardize the carrying out of any of the exempt purposes of the trust, within the meaning of § 4944 of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 4944, which would give rise to any liability for the tax imposed by § 4944(a); and

Making any “taxable expenditures,” as defined in § 4945(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 4945(d), which would give rise to any liability for the tax imposed by § 4945(a);

This section shall not apply either to those “split-interest trusts” or to amounts of them which are not subject to the prohibitions applicable to a “private foundation” as defined in § 509(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 509(a), by reason of § 4947.

In the administration of any trust which is a “private foundation” or a “charitable trust” as defined in §§ 509(a) and 4947(a)(1), respectively, of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. §§ 509(a) and 4947(a)(1), there shall be distributed, for the purposes specified in the trust instrument, for each taxable year, amounts of income and, if necessary, corpus at least sufficient to avoid liability for the tax imposed by 26 U.S.C. § 4942(a).

The provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall not apply to any trust to the extent that a court of competent jurisdiction shall determine that the application would be contrary to the terms of the instrument governing the trust and that the instrument may not properly be changed to conform to these subsections.

All references to sections of the Internal Revenue Code shall include future amendments to those sections and corresponding provisions of future internal revenue laws.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 253, § 1.

18-4-23.
Charitable remainder trusts.

As used in this section the term “charitable remainder trust” has the meaning ascribed to that term in § 664 of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 664, and in §§ 1.664-1 through 1.664-4 of proposed regulations dealing with charitable remainder trusts, published in the federal register on September 18, 1971, on behalf of the secretary of the treasury of the United States or the secretary’s delegate.

The superior court shall have jurisdiction:

In the case of property transferred to a trust created before August 1, 1969, whose governing instrument provides that an organization described in § 170(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 170(c), receives an irrevocable remainder interest in the trust, to enter judgment whereunder, in order that the trust qualify as a charitable remainder trust, the transferred property and any undistributed income from it is to be severed and placed in a separate trust, within the meaning of § 1.664-1(g)(2) of the proposed regulations.

In the case of a trust created subsequent to July 31, 1969, whose governing instrument provides that an organization referred to in 26 U.S.C. § 170(c) receives an irrevocable remainder interest in the trust, to enter judgment whereunder, in order that the trust qualify as a charitable remainder trust, the governing instrument is to be amended by including in the instrument the provisions required by the proposed regulations to be included; deleting from the instrument the provisions prohibited by the proposed regulations from being included; and, to the extent found by the court to be in furtherance of the intention of the creator of the trust, including provisions permitted by the proposed regulations to be included.

The provisions of subsection (b) of this section shall not apply to the extent that the superior court determines that the application would be contrary to the terms of the instrument governing the trust and that the instrument may not properly be changed to conform to the proposed regulations.

All references to sections of the Internal Revenue Code shall include future amendments to those sections and corresponding provisions of future internal revenue laws; and all references to sections of proposed regulations shall include regulations dealing with charitable remainder trusts as finally adopted by the secretary of the treasury or the secretary’s delegate and future amendments to those regulations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 193, § 1.

18-4-24.
Termination of small trusts.

Any corporate trustee authorized to serve as a trustee under chapter 3.1 of title 19, which is a trustee of any inter vivos or testamentary trust, may, in its sole discretion, or, if there is a cotrustee or cotrustees, after having obtained the approval of any cotrustee, terminate the trust in whole or in part, if the current market value of the trust principal is less than two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000). The existence of any spendthrift or similar protective provision shall not preclude termination of that trust.

The trust principal and income on hand, less fees and expenses, shall be distributed to one or more beneficiaries and remaindermen, or their legal representative, in the proportions and amounts that the trustee in its discretion determines to be appropriate under the circumstances, giving consideration to the terms of the trust and the interests of the income beneficiaries and remaindermen. The recipient shall release the trustee or trustees from liability upon distribution of the amounts held.

The interest of a minor beneficiary, or any portion of the interest, may be converted into qualifying property and distributed to a custodian pursuant to the Rhode Island Uniform Transfers to Minors Act, chapter 7 of this title, or similar acts in other states.

Any trust qualifying for the marital deduction under appropriate provisions of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 1 et seq., shall be distributed only to the surviving spouse of the decedent or settlor.

Any trust qualifying for the charitable deduction under appropriate provisions of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 1 et seq., shall be distributed only to the appropriate charity or charities or in a manner to assure the continued qualification of the distribution for the charitable deduction. The trustee shall not be required to look into the application by the charity of the amount distributed.

The termination may occur only after written notice sent by certified mail to all interested persons who then have an interest in the trust, or their legal or natural guardians. The term “interested person” means any living person or existing organization who is a current income beneficiary or who would be a vested remainderman of the trust if the trust were to terminate at the time of the notification.

The written notice required by this section shall:

State that the trustee intends to terminate the trust in accordance with this section;

Include a schedule of current trust assets and describe the plan of distribution;

Set forth all rights of the interested person to object to the termination or plan of distribution as set forth in subsection (d) of this section; and

State that the trustee may proceed to terminate the trust, notwithstanding any objection to the termination or plan of distribution.

Any interested person shall have thirty (30) days after receiving written notice in accordance with subsection (c) of this section to object to the termination of the trust or the plan of distribution in writing to the trustee, stating the grounds for the objection. If the trustee has received no written objection to the proposed termination or plan of distribution within the thirty (30) day period, it may proceed to terminate the trust, subject to the waiting period contained in subdivision (4) of this subsection.

A trustee receiving a written objection to the proposed termination or plan of distribution from an interested person within thirty (30) days of the person’s receipt of written notice may: (i) reformulate the proposed plan, or (ii) state its intention to proceed with the original plan of distribution. The trustee shall then re-notify all interested persons of its intentions in a writing sent by certified mail. The re-notification shall begin again the thirty (30) day period referred to in subdivision (1) of this subsection.

A trustee receiving a written objection to the proposed reformulated plan of distribution from an interested person within thirty (30) days of the person’s receipt of written notice of the reformulated plan may proceed to terminate the trust in accordance with the plan, without court proceeding or approval, notwithstanding the objection, provided that all interested persons have been further notified in writing sent by certified mail of:

The objection;

The trustee’s intention to proceed to terminate the trust, notwithstanding the objection; and

Their right to petition the superior court to prevent the termination of the trust or to modify the plan of distribution.

Any interested person, within three (3) months of the mailing of the initial or the further notice of the trustee’s intention to proceed with the termination, notwithstanding an objection, may petition the superior court to prevent termination or modify the plan of distribution or may send the trustee a written waiver of the right to petition. The trustee shall not distribute the assets of the trust until three (3) months from the date of the receipt by the last interested person to receive notice or the further written notice as provided in subdivision (3) of this subsection.

Superior court approval of a termination of a small trust shall be required whenever there is no corporate trustee. An individual trustee may petition the superior court after notice to all interested persons according to the notice provisions in subsection (c) of this section. The court shall make an order of distribution of the trust property which shall specify the appropriate share of each interested person who is to share in the proceeds of the trust, taking into account the interests of income beneficiaries or remaindermen so as to conform as nearly as possible the intention of the trust or testator. The superior court, in addition, may make any other and further orders that it deems proper or necessary to protect the interests of the beneficiaries and of the trustee. All provisions of subsection (b) of this section shall apply to terminations under this subsection.

Notwithstanding any other provision contained in this section, any corporate trustee of a trust may seek superior court approval of the termination, and after submission of a principal accounting, be released, along with any cotrustee, from all liability with respect to the trust.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 281, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 392, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 434, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 442, § 1.

18-4-25.
Consolidation or division of trusts.

Upon petition by a trustee, beneficiary, or any party in interest and for good cause shown, the court, after notice to all parties in interest and a hearing, may order the division of a trust into two (2) or more single trusts, or consolidate two (2) or more trusts which have either a common creator or common beneficiaries into a single trust, upon terms and conditions that it deems appropriate; provided, that it is satisfied that:

Consolidation or division is not inconsistent with the intent of the creator of the trust with regard to any trust to be consolidated or divided; and

Consolidation or division would be in the best interest of the beneficiaries as a whole, taking into account tax, legal, administrative, and/or other considerations and would not materially impair the respective interests of the beneficiaries as a whole.

This section shall apply to all trusts whenever created, whether inter vivos or testamentary, whether created by the same or different instruments, whether created by the same or different persons, and regardless of where created or administered.

This section shall not limit the right of a trustee, acting in accordance with the applicable provisions of the governing instrument, to divide or consolidate trusts.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 518, § 1.